Missouri, session 2026, SB1002.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 162.301, 162.341, 162.459, and
162.481, RSMo, are repealed and six new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 162.082, 162.301, 162.341,
162.459, 162.481, and 164.320, to read as follows:
162.082. 1. Elections for all directors of any school
district in which a majority of the district is located in a
county with more than four hundred thousand but fewer than
five hundred thousand inhabitants shall be held on the first
Tuesday after the first Monday in November of even-numbered
years, and the term of every school board member elected in
2028 and every year thereafter shall be four years,
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary.
2. Any school board member whose term expires prior to
the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of 2028
or in any other odd-numbered year thereafter shall continue
to serve until his or her successor is duly elected and
qualified at the next general election.
3. In an even-numbered year, the number of school
board seats to be elected shall be equal to those with terms
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SS SB 1002 2
that would have expired in the previous odd-numbered year
and those with terms expiring in such even-numbered year.
The candidates in each school board election receiving the
highest number of votes shall be elected for terms of four
years.
4. At the time of filing a declaration of candidacy, a
candidate for election as a school board member may
voluntarily designate such candidate's political party
affiliation and consent to have that affiliation appear
beside the candidate's name on the ballot.
5. This section shall only apply to elections for
directors in school districts in which a majority of the
district is located in a county with more than four hundred
thousand but fewer than five hundred thousand inhabitants.
162.301. 1. Within fourteen days after the election
of the first school board in each seven-director district,
other than an urban district, and within fourteen days after
each [annual] election, the board shall meet. The newly
elected members shall qualify by taking the oath of office
prescribed by Article VII, Section 11, of the Constitution
of Missouri.
2. Except as provided in subsection 4 of this section,
the board shall organize by the election of a president and
vice president, and the board shall, on or before the
fifteenth day of July of each year, elect a secretary and a
treasurer, who shall enter upon their respective duties on
the fifteenth day of July. The secretary and treasurer may
be or may not be members of the board. No compensation
shall be granted to either the secretary or the treasurer
until his report and settlement are made and filed or
published as the law directs.

SS SB 1002 3
3. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for
the transaction of business, but no contract shall be let,
person employed, bill approved or warrant ordered unless a
majority of the whole board votes therefor.
4. In a seven-director district, other than an urban
district, in which a majority of the district is located in
a county with more than four hundred thousand but fewer than
five hundred thousand inhabitants, the board shall organize
by the election of a president and vice president, and the
board shall, on or before the fifteenth day of January in
odd-numbered years, elect a secretary and a treasurer, who
shall enter upon their respective duties on the fifteenth
day of January. The secretary and treasurer may be or may
not be members of the board. No compensation shall be
granted to either the secretary or the treasurer until his
report and settlement are made and filed or published as the
law directs.
162.341. The annual election in seven-director
districts, except urban districts and those school districts
described in section 162.082, shall be held on municipal
election days.
162.459. 1. Notwithstanding other provisions of law
to the contrary, the school board of each school district
designated in the statutes as a seven-director or urban
school district shall consist of seven members.
2. At the first election for members of the school
board in each of such districts after January 1, 1993, and
each three years thereafter, three members of the school
board shall be elected; [except,] provided that, this
subsection shall not apply to any school district described
in section 162.082; and further provided, that no school
district composed of seven members as of January 1, 1993,

SS SB 1002 4
shall be required to modify its schedule of electing board
members.
[2.] 3. Provisions of law applicable to seven-director
and urban school districts, except those which conflict with
the provisions of this section, shall apply to and govern
the school districts designated in subsection 1 of this
section.
162.481. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this
section and sections 162.492 and 162.563, all elections of
school directors in urban school districts shall be held
biennially at the same times and places as municipal
elections.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3, 4,
and 5 of this section, hereafter when a seven-director
district becomes an urban school district, the directors of
the prior seven-director district shall continue as
directors of the urban school district until the expiration
of the terms for which they were elected and until their
successors are elected as provided in this subsection. The
first biennial school election for directors shall be held
in the urban school district at the time provided in
subsection 1 which is on the date of or subsequent to the
expiration of the terms of the directors of the prior
district which are first to expire, and directors shall be
elected to succeed the directors of the prior district whose
terms have expired. If the terms of two directors only have
expired, the directors elected at the first biennial school
election in the urban school district shall be elected for
terms of six years. If the terms of four directors have
expired, two directors shall be elected for terms of six
years and two shall be elected for terms of four years. At
the next succeeding biennial election held in the urban

SS SB 1002 5
school district, successors for the remaining directors of
the prior seven-director district shall be elected. If only
two directors are to be elected they shall be elected for
terms of six years each. If four directors are to be
elected, two shall be elected for terms of six years and two
shall be elected for terms of two years. After seven
directors of the urban school district have been elected
under this subsection, their successors shall be elected for
terms of six years.
3. In any school district in which a majority of the
district is located in any home rule city with more than one
hundred fifty-five thousand but fewer than two hundred
thousand inhabitants, elections shall be held annually at
the same times and places as general municipal elections for
all years where one or more terms expire, and the terms
shall be for three years and until their successors are duly
elected and qualified for all directors elected on and after
August 28, 1998.
4. For any school district which becomes an urban
school district by reason of the 2000 federal decennial
census, elections shall be held annually at the same times
and places as general municipal elections for all years
where one or more terms expire, and the terms shall be for
three years and until their successors are duly elected and
qualified for all directors elected on and after August 28,
2001.
5. In any school district in any county with a charter
form of government and with more than three hundred thousand
but fewer than four hundred fifty thousand inhabitants which
becomes an urban school district by reason of the 2010
federal decennial census, elections shall be held [annually
at the same times and places as general municipal elections

SS SB 1002 6
for all years where one or more terms expire] as provided in
section 162.082, and the terms shall be for [three] four
years and until their successors are duly elected and
qualified for all directors elected on and after [April 2,
2012] November 7, 2028.
6. In any urban school district in a county of the
first classification with more than eighty-three thousand
but fewer than ninety-two thousand inhabitants and with a
home rule city with more than seventy-six thousand but fewer
than ninety-one thousand inhabitants as the county seat,
elections shall be held annually at the same times and
places as general municipal elections for all years where
one or more terms expire, and upon expiration of any term
after August 28, 2015, the term of office shall be for three
years and until their successors are duly elected and
qualified.
164.320. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, all proposals submitted by a school board
described in subsection 2 of this section to the voters for
approval for the purpose of levying a new tax or renewing or
increasing the current levy of an existing tax, including
for the issuance of bonded indebtedness, shall be submitted
by the school board on a general election day held on the
first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of even-
numbered years.
2. This section shall apply only to a school district
in which a majority of the district is located in a county
with more than four hundred thousand but fewer than five
hundred thousand inhabitants.
✓